Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-5] Cancellation of a
distressed property consultant contract. (a) In addition to any other
legal right to rescind a contract, any distressed property owner has the right
to cancel a distressed property consultant contract, without any penalty or
obligation, at any time before the distressed property consultant has fully
performed each and every service the distressed property consultant contracted
to perform or represented would be performed.

(b) Cancellation occurs when any owner of a
distressed property delivers, by any means, written notice of cancellation to
the address specified in the distressed property consultant contract.

(c) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail,
is effective when deposited in the mail with postage prepaid. Notice by
certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the address specified in
the distressed property consultant contract, shall be conclusive proof of
notice of cancellation.

(d) Notice of cancellation given by any owner
of a distressed property need not take the particular form as provided with the
distressed property consultant contract and, however expressed, is effective if
it indicates the intention of an owner not to be bound by the contract. [L
2008, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next